Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1526.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 36-2901.06, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE36-2901.06. Capitation rate adjustments; limitation Capitation rate adjustments shall be are limited to utilization of existing services and inflation unless policy changes, including creation or expansion of programs, have been approved by the legislature or are specifically required by federal law or court mandate. END_STATUTE